Illinois, session 104th, HB3475.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Certified Family Health Aide Program for Children and Adults 6Act. 7    Section 5. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to create 8the Certified Family Health Aide designation, recognizing the 9vital role family members play in caring for children with 10complex medical needs. This designation is intended to provide 11a mechanism for financial compensation, thereby mitigating the 12financial hardship often experienced by families when a 13caregiver must reduce or cease employment to provide such 14care. This Act further aims to support families in identifying 15and securing long-term, consistent in-home care for their 16children with complex medical needs, which is crucial for the 17well-being and development of those children. 18    Section 10. Certified family health aide program for 19children and adults. 20    (a) "Certified family health aide" means a person who: 21        (1) is 18 years of age or older; 22        (2) has the following relationship with the family   HB3475- 2 -LRB104 11129 BAB 21211 b1    member receiving or who is eligible to receive the 2    services enumerated in this Section: 3            (i) spouse; 4            (ii) sibling or step-sibling; 5            (iii) parent, step-parent, or adoptive parent; 6            (iv) grandparent; 7            (v) mother-in-law or father-in-law; 8            (vi) brother-in-law or sister-in-law; 9            (vii) legal guardian; or 10            (viii) caregiver designated by the legally 11        responsible caregiver; 12        (3) is a legally responsible caregiver, or has been 13    designated by a legally responsible caregiver, for a 14    person who receives or is eligible to receive: 15            (i) in-home shift nursing services under the Early 16        and Periodic Screening, Diagnostic and Treatment 17        benefit authorized under 42 CFR 441.50; or 18            (ii) in-home shift nursing through the home and 19        community-based services waiver program authorized 20        under Section 1915(c) of the Social Security Act for 21        persons who are medically fragile and technology 22        dependent; and 23        (4) is certified pursuant to this Section to perform 24    or to assist in performance of (1) in-home shift nursing 25    services under the Early and Periodic Screening, 26    Diagnostic and Treatment benefit authorized under 42 CFR   HB3475- 3 -LRB104 11129 BAB 21211 b1    441.50; or (2) in-home shift nursing services through the 2    home and community-based services waiver program 3    authorized under Section 1915(c) of the Social Security 4    Act for a designated person or designated persons who are 5    medically fragile and technology dependent and eligible to 6    receive the services laid out in this Section, including: 7            (i) the same tasks as a certified nursing 8        assistant; 9            (ii) medication administration; 10            (iii) tracheostomy care; 11            (iv) enteral care and therapy; and 12            (v) other needed services to support the 13        individual as set forth in Rule. 14    (b) The Department of Financial and Professional 15Regulation, in partnership with the Department of Health and 16the Department of Healthcare and Family Services, shall create 17a certification pathway for a legally responsible caregiver, 18or a person who has been designated by a legally responsible 19caregiver, who is seeking certification as a certified family 20health aide, including the promulgation of any necessary rules 21for the certification process. This certification pathway 22shall include documentation, in a manner designated by the 23Department of Financial and Professional Regulation, of 24initial training provided by hospitals licensed in the 25Hospital Licensing Act, children's community-based health care 26centers as defined in the Alternative Health Care Delivery   HB3475- 4 -LRB104 11129 BAB 21211 b1Act, or home nursing agencies as defined in the Home Health, 2Home Services, and Home Nursing Agency Licensing Act. 3    (c) A certified family health aide may only perform 4services to and for a person receiving or eligible to receive: 5(1) in-home shift nursing services under the Early and 6Periodic Screening, Diagnostic and Treatment benefit 7authorized under 42 CFR 441.50; or (2) in-home shift nursing 8services through the home and community-based services waiver 9program authorized under Section 1915(c) of the Social 10Security Act for persons who are medically fragile and 11technology dependent. To be eligible for reimbursement as a 12certified family health aide, a legally responsible caregiver 13or a person designated by a legally responsible caregiver must 14meet all certification requirements as set forth in this 15Section, in Section 5-206b of the Public Aide Code, and in any 16applicable administrative rule. 17    (d) The Department of Financial and Professional 18Regulation may adopt rules necessary to implement the 19provisions of this Act, including, but not limited to, 20required background checks for the certified family health 21aide. 22    Section 15. The Alternative Health Care Delivery Act is 23amended by changing Section 35 as follows: 24    (210 ILCS 3/35)  HB3475- 5 -LRB104 11129 BAB 21211 b1    Sec. 35. Alternative health care models authorized. 2Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, alternative 3health care models described in this Section may be 4established on a demonstration basis.5        (1) (Blank).6        (2) Alternative health care delivery model; 7    postsurgical recovery care center. A postsurgical recovery 8    care center is a designated site which provides 9    postsurgical recovery care for generally healthy patients 10    undergoing surgical procedures that potentially require 11    overnight nursing care, pain control, or observation that 12    would otherwise be provided in an inpatient setting. 13    Patients may be discharged from the postsurgical recovery 14    care center in less than 24 hours if the attending 15    physician or the facility's medical director believes the 16    patient has recovered enough to be discharged. A 17    postsurgical recovery care center is either freestanding 18    or a defined unit of an ambulatory surgical treatment 19    center or hospital. No facility, or portion of a facility, 20    may participate in a demonstration program as a 21    postsurgical recovery care center unless the facility has 22    been licensed as an ambulatory surgical treatment center 23    or hospital for at least 2 years before August 20, 1993 24    (the effective date of Public Act 88-441). The maximum 25    length of stay for patients in a postsurgical recovery 26    care center is not to exceed 48 hours unless the treating   HB3475- 6 -LRB104 11129 BAB 21211 b1    physician requests an extension of time from the recovery 2    center's medical director on the basis of medical or 3    clinical documentation that an additional care period is 4    required for the recovery of a patient and the medical 5    director approves the extension of time. In no case, 6    however, shall a patient's length of stay in a 7    postsurgical recovery care center be longer than 72 hours. 8    If a patient requires an additional care period after the 9    expiration of the 72-hour limit, the patient shall be 10    transferred to an appropriate facility. Reports on 11    variances from the 24-hour or 48-hour limit shall be sent 12    to the Department for its evaluation. The reports shall, 13    before submission to the Department, have removed from 14    them all patient and physician identifiers. Blood products 15    may be administered in the postsurgical recovery care 16    center model. In order to handle cases of complications, 17    emergencies, or exigent circumstances, every postsurgical 18    recovery care center as defined in this paragraph shall 19    maintain a contractual relationship, including a transfer 20    agreement, with a general acute care hospital. A 21    postsurgical recovery care center shall be no larger than 22    20 beds. A postsurgical recovery care center shall be 23    located within 15 minutes travel time from the general 24    acute care hospital with which the center maintains a 25    contractual relationship, including a transfer agreement, 26    as required under this paragraph.  HB3475- 7 -LRB104 11129 BAB 21211 b1        No postsurgical recovery care center shall 2    discriminate against any patient requiring treatment 3    because of the source of payment for services, including 4    Medicare and Medicaid recipients.5        The Department shall adopt rules to implement the 6    provisions of Public Act 88-441 concerning postsurgical 7    recovery care centers within 9 months after August 20, 8    1993. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a 9    postsurgical recovery care center model may provide sleep 10    laboratory or similar sleep studies in accordance with 11    applicable State and federal laws and regulations. 12        (3) Alternative health care delivery model; children's 13    community-based health care center. A children's 14    community-based health care center model is a designated 15    site that provides nursing care, clinical support 16    services, and therapies for a period of one to 14 days for 17    short-term stays and 120 days to facilitate transitions to 18    home or other appropriate settings for medically fragile 19    children, technology dependent children, and children with 20    special health care needs who are deemed clinically stable 21    by a physician and are younger than 22 years of age. This 22    care is to be provided in a home-like environment that 23    serves no more than 12 children at a time, except that a 24    children's community-based health care center in existence 25    on the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 100th 26    General Assembly that is located in Chicago on grade level   HB3475- 8 -LRB104 11129 BAB 21211 b1    for Life Safety Code purposes may provide care to no more 2    than 16 children at a time. Children's community-based 3    health care center services must be available through the 4    model to all families, including those whose care is paid 5    for through the Department of Healthcare and Family 6    Services, the Department of Children and Family Services, 7    the Department of Human Services, and insurance companies 8    who cover home health care services or private duty 9    nursing care in the home.10        Each children's community-based health care center 11    model location shall be physically separate and apart from 12    any other facility licensed by the Department of Public 13    Health under this or any other Act and shall provide the 14    following services: respite care, registered nursing or 15    licensed practical nursing care, transitional care to 16    facilitate home placement or other appropriate settings 17    and reunite families, medical day care, weekend camps, and 18    diagnostic studies typically done in the home setting.19        A children's community-based health care center shall 20    provide initial training, prior to home placement for, and 21    shall keep records in a manner designated by the 22    Department regarding, the certified family health aide, as 23    defined in the Certified Family Health Aide Program for 24    Children and Adults Act, identified as the legally 25    responsible caregiver or designated by a legally 26    responsible caregiver for the medical care of an   HB3475- 9 -LRB104 11129 BAB 21211 b1    individual who receives or is eligible to receive:2            (i) in-home shift nursing services under the Early 3        and Periodic Screening, Diagnostic and Treatment 4        benefit authorized under 42 CFR 441.50; or5            (ii) in-home shift nursing through the home and 6        community-based services waiver program authorized 7        under Section 1915(c) of the Social Security Act for 8        persons who are medically fragile and technology 9        dependent. 10        Coverage for the services provided by the Department 11    of Healthcare and Family Services under this paragraph (3) 12    is contingent upon federal waiver approval and is provided 13    only to Medicaid eligible clients participating in the 14    home and community based services waiver designated in 15    Section 1915(c) of the Social Security Act for medically 16    frail and technologically dependent children or children 17    in Department of Children and Family Services foster care 18    who receive home health benefits.19        (4) Alternative health care delivery model; community 20    based residential rehabilitation center. A community-based 21    residential rehabilitation center model is a designated 22    site that provides rehabilitation or support, or both, for 23    persons who have experienced severe brain injury, who are 24    medically stable, and who no longer require acute 25    rehabilitative care or intense medical or nursing 26    services. The average length of stay in a community-based   HB3475- 10 -LRB104 11129 BAB 21211 b1    residential rehabilitation center shall not exceed 4 2    months. As an integral part of the services provided, 3    individuals are housed in a supervised living setting 4    while having immediate access to the community. The 5    residential rehabilitation center authorized by the 6    Department may have more than one residence included under 7    the license. A residence may be no larger than 12 beds and 8    shall be located as an integral part of the community. Day 9    treatment or individualized outpatient services shall be 10    provided for persons who reside in their own home. 11    Functional outcome goals shall be established for each 12    individual. Services shall include, but are not limited 13    to, case management, training and assistance with 14    activities of daily living, nursing consultation, 15    traditional therapies (physical, occupational, speech), 16    functional interventions in the residence and community 17    (job placement, shopping, banking, recreation), 18    counseling, self-management strategies, productive 19    activities, and multiple opportunities for skill 20    acquisition and practice throughout the day. The design of 21    individualized program plans shall be consistent with the 22    outcome goals that are established for each resident. The 23    programs provided in this setting shall be accredited by 24    the Commission on Accreditation of Rehabilitation 25    Facilities (CARF). The program shall have been accredited 26    by CARF as a Brain Injury Community-Integrative Program   HB3475- 11 -LRB104 11129 BAB 21211 b1    for at least 3 years.2        (5) Alternative health care delivery model; 3    Alzheimer's disease management center. An Alzheimer's 4    disease management center model is a designated site that 5    provides a safe and secure setting for care of persons 6    diagnosed with Alzheimer's disease. An Alzheimer's disease 7    management center model shall be a facility separate from 8    any other facility licensed by the Department of Public 9    Health under this or any other Act. An Alzheimer's disease 10    management center shall conduct and document an assessment 11    of each resident every 6 months. The assessment shall 12    include an evaluation of daily functioning, cognitive 13    status, other medical conditions, and behavioral problems. 14    An Alzheimer's disease management center shall develop and 15    implement an ongoing treatment plan for each resident. The 16    treatment plan shall have defined goals. The Alzheimer's 17    disease management center shall treat behavioral problems 18    and mood disorders using nonpharmacologic approaches such 19    as environmental modification, task simplification, and 20    other appropriate activities. All staff must have 21    necessary training to care for all stages of Alzheimer's 22    Disease. An Alzheimer's disease management center shall 23    provide education and support for residents and 24    caregivers. The education and support shall include 25    referrals to support organizations for educational 26    materials on community resources, support groups, legal   HB3475- 12 -LRB104 11129 BAB 21211 b1    and financial issues, respite care, and future care needs 2    and options. The education and support shall also include 3    a discussion of the resident's need to make advance 4    directives and to identify surrogates for medical and 5    legal decision-making. The provisions of this paragraph 6    establish the minimum level of services that must be 7    provided by an Alzheimer's disease management center. An 8    Alzheimer's disease management center model shall have no 9    more than 100 residents. Nothing in this paragraph (5) 10    shall be construed as prohibiting a person or facility 11    from providing services and care to persons with 12    Alzheimer's disease as otherwise authorized under State 13    law.14        (6) Alternative health care delivery model; birth 15    center. A birth center shall be exclusively dedicated to 16    serving the childbirth-related needs of women and their 17    newborns and shall have no more than 10 beds. A birth 18    center is a designated site that is away from the mother's 19    usual place of residence and in which births are planned 20    to occur following a normal, uncomplicated, and low-risk 21    pregnancy. A birth center shall offer prenatal care and 22    community education services and shall coordinate these 23    services with other health care services available in the 24    community. 25            (A) A birth center shall not be separately 26        licensed if it is one of the following:  HB3475- 13 -LRB104 11129 BAB 21211 b1                (1) A part of a hospital; or2                (2) A freestanding facility that is physically 3            distinct from a hospital but is operated under a 4            license issued to a hospital under the Hospital 5            Licensing Act.6            (B) A separate birth center license shall be 7        required if the birth center is operated as:8                (1) A part of the operation of a federally 9            qualified health center as designated by the 10            United States Department of Health and Human 11            Services; or12                (2) A facility other than one described in 13            subparagraph (A)(1), (A)(2), or (B)(1) of this 14            paragraph (6) whose costs are reimbursable under 15            Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act.16        In adopting rules for birth centers, the Department 17    shall consider: the American Association of Birth Centers' 18    Standards for Freestanding Birth Centers; the American 19    Academy of Pediatrics/American College of Obstetricians 20    and Gynecologists Guidelines for Perinatal Care; and the 21    Regionalized Perinatal Health Care Code. The Department's 22    rules shall stipulate the eligibility criteria for birth 23    center admission. The Department's rules shall stipulate 24    the necessary equipment for emergency care according to 25    the American Association of Birth Centers' standards and 26    any additional equipment deemed necessary by the   HB3475- 14 -LRB104 11129 BAB 21211 b1    Department. The Department's rules shall provide for a 2    time period within which each birth center not part of a 3    hospital must become accredited by either the Commission 4    for the Accreditation of Freestanding Birth Centers or The 5    Joint Commission.6        A birth center shall be certified to participate in 7    the Medicare and Medicaid programs under Titles XVIII and 8    XIX, respectively, of the federal Social Security Act. To 9    the extent necessary, the Illinois Department of 10    Healthcare and Family Services shall apply for a waiver 11    from the United States Health Care Financing 12    Administration to allow birth centers to be reimbursed 13    under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act.14        A birth center that is not operated under a hospital 15    license shall be located within a ground travel time 16    distance from the general acute care hospital with which 17    the birth center maintains a contractual relationship, 18    including a transfer agreement, as required under this 19    paragraph, that allows for an emergency caesarian delivery 20    to be started within 30 minutes of the decision a 21    caesarian delivery is necessary. A birth center operating 22    under a hospital license shall be located within a ground 23    travel time distance from the licensed hospital that 24    allows for an emergency caesarian delivery to be started 25    within 30 minutes of the decision a caesarian delivery is 26    necessary.  HB3475- 15 -LRB104 11129 BAB 21211 b1        The services of a medical director physician, licensed 2    to practice medicine in all its branches, who is certified 3    or eligible for certification by the American College of 4    Obstetricians and Gynecologists or the American Board of 5    Osteopathic Obstetricians and Gynecologists or has 6    hospital obstetrical privileges are required in birth 7    centers. The medical director in consultation with the 8    Director of Nursing and Midwifery Services shall 9    coordinate the clinical staff and overall provision of 10    patient care. The medical director or his or her physician 11    designee shall be available on the premises or within a 12    close proximity as defined by rule. The medical director 13    and the Director of Nursing and Midwifery Services shall 14    jointly develop and approve policies defining the criteria 15    to determine which pregnancies are accepted as normal, 16    uncomplicated, and low-risk, and the anesthesia services 17    available at the center. No general anesthesia may be 18    administered at the center.19        If a birth center employs certified nurse midwives, a 20    certified nurse midwife shall be the Director of Nursing 21    and Midwifery Services who is responsible for the 22    development of policies and procedures for services as 23    provided by Department rules.24        An obstetrician, family practitioner, or certified 25    nurse midwife shall attend each woman in labor from the 26    time of admission through birth and throughout the   HB3475- 16 -LRB104 11129 BAB 21211 b1    immediate postpartum period. Attendance may be delegated 2    only to another physician or certified nurse midwife. 3    Additionally, a second staff person shall also be present 4    at each birth who is licensed or certified in Illinois in a 5    health-related field and under the supervision of the 6    physician or certified nurse midwife in attendance, has 7    specialized training in labor and delivery techniques and 8    care of newborns, and receives planned and ongoing 9    training as needed to perform assigned duties effectively.10        The maximum length of stay in a birth center shall be 11    consistent with existing State laws allowing a 48-hour 12    stay or appropriate post-delivery care, if discharged 13    earlier than 48 hours.14        A birth center shall participate in the Illinois 15    Perinatal System under the Developmental Disability 16    Prevention Act. At a minimum, this participation shall 17    require a birth center to establish a letter of agreement 18    with a hospital designated under the Perinatal System. A 19    hospital that operates or has a letter of agreement with a 20    birth center shall include the birth center under its 21    maternity service plan under the Hospital Licensing Act 22    and shall include the birth center in the hospital's 23    letter of agreement with its regional perinatal center.24        A birth center may not discriminate against any 25    patient requiring treatment because of the source of 26    payment for services, including Medicare and Medicaid   HB3475- 17 -LRB104 11129 BAB 21211 b1    recipients.2        No general anesthesia and no surgery may be performed 3    at a birth center. The Department may by rule add birth 4    center patient eligibility criteria or standards as it 5    deems necessary. The Department shall by rule require each 6    birth center to report the information which the 7    Department shall make publicly available, which shall 8    include, but is not limited to, the following:9            (i) Birth center ownership.10            (ii) Sources of payment for services.11            (iii) Utilization data involving patient length of 12        stay.13            (iv) Admissions and discharges.14            (v) Complications.15            (vi) Transfers.16            (vii) Unusual incidents.17            (viii) Deaths.18            (ix) Any other publicly reported data required 19        under the Illinois Consumer Guide.20            (x) Post-discharge patient status data where 21        patients are followed for 14 days after discharge from 22        the birth center to determine whether the mother or 23        baby developed a complication or infection.24        Within 9 months after the effective date of this 25    amendatory Act of the 95th General Assembly, the 26    Department shall adopt rules that are developed with   HB3475- 18 -LRB104 11129 BAB 21211 b1    consideration of: the American Association of Birth 2    Centers' Standards for Freestanding Birth Centers; the 3    American Academy of Pediatrics/American College of 4    Obstetricians and Gynecologists Guidelines for Perinatal 5    Care; and the Regionalized Perinatal Health Care Code.6        The Department shall adopt other rules as necessary to 7    implement the provisions of this amendatory Act of the 8    95th General Assembly within 9 months after the effective 9    date of this amendatory Act of the 95th General Assembly.10(Source: P.A. 100-518, eff. 12-8-17 (see Section 5 of P.A. 11100-558 for the effective date of changes made by P.A. 12100-518).) 13    Section 20. The Home Health, Home Services, and Home 14Nursing Agency Licensing Act is amended by changing Section 152.11 and by adding Section 2.13 as follows: 16    (210 ILCS 55/2.11)17    Sec. 2.11. "Home nursing agency" means an agency that 18provides services directly, or acts as a placement agency, in 19order to deliver skilled nursing and home health aide services 20to persons in their personal residences or a certified family 21health aide as defined by the Certified Family Health Aide 22Program for Children and Adults Act, for individuals receiving 23or eligible to receive the following services: (1) in-home 24shift nursing services under the Early and Periodic Screening,   HB3475- 19 -LRB104 11129 BAB 21211 b1Diagnostic and Treatment benefit authorized under 42 CFR 2441.50; or (2) in-home shift nursing services through the home 3and community-based services waiver program authorized under 4Section 1915(c) of the Social Security Act for persons who are 5medically fragile and technology dependent. A home nursing 6agency provides services that would require a licensed nurse 7to perform. Home health aide services are provided under the 8direction of a registered professional nurse or advanced 9practice registered nurse. A home nursing agency does not 10require licensure as a home health agency under this Act. 11"Home nursing agency" does not include an individually 12licensed nurse acting as a private contractor or a person that 13provides or procures temporary employment in health care 14facilities, as defined in the Nurse Agency Licensing Act.15(Source: P.A. 100-513, eff. 1-1-18.) 16    (210 ILCS 55/2.13 new)17    Sec. 2.13. Certified family health aide. A home nursing 18agency shall provide initial and ongoing training for, and 19shall keep records in a manner designated by the Department 20regarding, the certified family health aide, as defined in the 21Certified Family Health Aide Program for Children and Adults 22Act, identified as the legally responsible caregiver or 23designated by the legally responsible caregiver for an 24individual who receives or is eligible to receive:25        (1) in-home shift nursing services under the Early and   HB3475- 20 -LRB104 11129 BAB 21211 b1    Periodic Screening, Diagnostic and Treatment benefit 2    authorized under 42 CFR 441.50; or3        (2) in-home shift nursing through the home and 4    community-based services waiver program authorized under 5    Section 1915(c) of the Social Security Act for persons who 6    are medically fragile and technology dependent. 7    Section 25. The Hospital Licensing Act is amended by 8adding Section 17 as follows: 9    (210 ILCS 85/17 new)10    Sec. 17. Certified family health aide. Hospitals managing 11the care of an individual to be discharged under the care of a 12home nursing agency shall provide initial training, and shall 13document in a manner designated by the Department, for the 14certified family health aide, as defined in the Certified 15Family Health Aide Program for Children and Adults Act, 16identified as the legally responsible caregiver or designated 17by a legally responsible caregiver for an individual who 18receives or is eligible to receive in-home shift nursing 19services under the Early and Periodic Screening, Diagnostic 20and Treatment benefit authorized under 42 CFR 441.50 or in 21home shift nursing through the home and community-based 22services waiver program authorized under Section 1915(c) of 23the Social Security Act for persons who are medically fragile 24and technology dependent.   HB3475- 21 -LRB104 11129 BAB 21211 b1    Section 30. The Nurse Practice Act is amended by changing 2Section 50-15 as follows: 3    (225 ILCS 65/50-15)  (was 225 ILCS 65/5-15)4    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)5    Sec. 50-15. Policy; application of Act. 6    (a) For the protection of life and the promotion of 7health, and the prevention of illness and communicable 8diseases, any person practicing or offering to practice 9advanced, professional, or practical nursing in Illinois shall 10submit evidence that he or she is qualified to practice, and 11shall be licensed as provided under this Act. No person shall 12practice or offer to practice advanced, professional, or 13practical nursing in Illinois or use any title, sign, card or 14device to indicate that such a person is practicing 15professional or practical nursing unless such person has been 16licensed under the provisions of this Act.17    (b) This Act does not prohibit the following:18        (1) The practice of nursing in Federal employment in 19    the discharge of the employee's duties by a person who is 20    employed by the United States government or any bureau, 21    division or agency thereof and is a legally qualified and 22    licensed nurse of another state or territory and not in 23    conflict with Sections 50-50, 55-10, 60-10, and 70-5 of 24    this Act.  HB3475- 22 -LRB104 11129 BAB 21211 b1        (2) Nursing that is included in the program of study 2    by students enrolled in programs of nursing or in current 3    nurse practice update courses approved by the Department.4        (3) The furnishing of nursing assistance in an 5    emergency.6        (4) The practice of nursing by a nurse who holds an 7    active license in another state when providing services to 8    patients in Illinois during a bonafide emergency or in 9    immediate preparation for or during interstate transit.10        (5) The incidental care of the sick by members of the 11    family, domestic servants or housekeepers, or care of the 12    sick where treatment is by prayer or spiritual means.13        (6) Persons from being employed as unlicensed 14    assistive personnel in private homes, long term care 15    facilities, nurseries, hospitals or other institutions.16        (7) The practice of practical nursing by one who is a 17    licensed practical nurse under the laws of another U.S. 18    jurisdiction and has applied in writing to the Department, 19    in form and substance satisfactory to the Department, for 20    a license as a licensed practical nurse and who is 21    qualified to receive such license under this Act, until 22    (i) the expiration of 6 months after the filing of such 23    written application, (ii) the withdrawal of such 24    application, or (iii) the denial of such application by 25    the Department.26        (8) The practice of advanced practice registered   HB3475- 23 -LRB104 11129 BAB 21211 b1    nursing by one who is an advanced practice registered 2    nurse under the laws of another United States jurisdiction 3    or a foreign jurisdiction and has applied in writing to 4    the Department, in form and substance satisfactory to the 5    Department, for a license as an advanced practice 6    registered nurse and who is qualified to receive such 7    license under this Act, until (i) the expiration of 6 8    months after the filing of such written application, (ii) 9    the withdrawal of such application, or (iii) the denial of 10    such application by the Department. 11        (9) The practice of professional nursing by one who is 12    a registered professional nurse under the laws of another 13    United States jurisdiction or a foreign jurisdiction and 14    has applied in writing to the Department, in form and 15    substance satisfactory to the Department, for a license as 16    a registered professional nurse and who is qualified to 17    receive such license under Section 55-10, until (1) the 18    expiration of 6 months after the filing of such written 19    application, (2) the withdrawal of such application, or 20    (3) the denial of such application by the Department.21        (10) The practice of professional nursing that is 22    included in a program of study by one who is a registered 23    professional nurse under the laws of another United States 24    jurisdiction or a foreign jurisdiction and who is enrolled 25    in a graduate nursing education program or a program for 26    the completion of a baccalaureate nursing degree in this   HB3475- 24 -LRB104 11129 BAB 21211 b1    State, which includes clinical supervision by faculty as 2    determined by the educational institution offering the 3    program and the health care organization where the 4    practice of nursing occurs.5        (11) Any person licensed in this State under any other 6    Act from engaging in the practice for which she or he is 7    licensed.8        (12) Delegation to authorized direct care staff 9    trained under Section 15.4 of the Mental Health and 10    Developmental Disabilities Administrative Act consistent 11    with the policies of the Department. 12        (13) (Blank).13        (14) County correctional personnel from delivering 14    prepackaged medication for self-administration to an 15    individual detainee in a correctional facility. 16        (15) The practice of relevant nursing care by a 17    legally responsible caregiver or a person designated by a 18    legally responsible caregiver who has been certified as a 19    certified family health aide, as defined by 210 ILCS 57, 20    to perform for a person who receives or is eligible to 21    receive the following services: (i) in-home shift nursing 22    services under the Early and Periodic Screening, 23    Diagnostic and Treatment benefit authorized under 42 CFR 24    441.50; or (ii) in-home shift nursing services through the 25    home and community-based services waiver program 26    authorized under Section 1915(c) of the Social Security   HB3475- 25 -LRB104 11129 BAB 21211 b1    Act for persons who are medically fragile and technology 2    dependent. 3    Nothing in this Act shall be construed to limit the 4delegation of tasks or duties by a physician, dentist, or 5podiatric physician to a licensed practical nurse, a 6registered professional nurse, or other persons. 7(Source: P.A. 100-513, eff. 1-1-18.) 8    Section 35. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 9adding Section 5-2.06b as follows: 10    (305 ILCS 5/5-2.06b new)11    Sec. 5-2.06b. Certified family health aide program for 12children and adults. By January 1, 2026, The Department of 13Healthcare and Family Services shall apply for a Home and 14Community-Based Services State Plan amendment and federal 15waiver amendment necessary to reimburse a legally responsible 16caregiver or a person designated by a legally responsible 17caregiver, as defined in the Certified Family Health Aide 18Program for Children and Adults Act, who has achieved 19certification as a certified family health aide to perform (1) 20in-home shift nursing services under the Early and Periodic 21Screening, Diagnostic and Treatment benefit authorized under 2242 CFR 441.50; or (2) in-home shift nursing services through 23the home and community-based services waiver program 24authorized under Section 1915(c) of the Social Security Act   HB3475- 26 -LRB104 11129 BAB 21211 b1for a designated person or designated persons who are 2medically fragile and technology dependent and in need and 3eligible for the above services. Upon federal approval of any 4State Plan amendment or waiver amendment, the Department may 5adopt rules in partnership with the Department of Public 6Health to specify the federally-approved services eligible for 7reimbursement under the certified family health aide 8certification and to adopt any other policies or procedures 9necessary to implement this Section.